Utah statutes.
77-30-2.   Duty of governor to deliver person charged with crime upon demand by other state.

Subject to the provisions of this act, the provisions of the Constitution of the United States controlling, and any and all Acts of Congress enacted in pursuance thereof, it is the duty of the governor of this state to have arrested and delivered up to the executive authority of any other state of the United States any person charged in that state with treason, felony or other crime who has fled from justice and is found in this state.



Enacted by Chapter 15, 1980 General Session

